Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 3. Illegal Activities in Premises Not Subject to Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act.

Sec. 34.05.100.
Tenant responsibilities in premises not subject to AS 34.03.

In rented premises other than premises to which the provisions of AS 34.03 apply, the tenant may not knowingly engage at the premises in prostitution, an illegal activity involving a place of prostitution, an illegal activity involving alcoholic beverages, an illegal activity involving gambling or promoting gambling, an illegal activity involving a controlled substance, or an illegal activity involving an imitation controlled substance, or knowingly permit others in the premises to engage in one or more of those activities at the rental premises.

If there is noncompliance with (a) of this section, a person may seek relief under AS

09.50.170

—

09.50.240

.

An order of abatement entered by a court under AS

09.50.210

against premises under this section terminates a rental agreement on the premises subject to the order of abatement.

In this section,

“illegal activity involving alcoholic beverages,” “illegal activity involving a controlled substance,” “illegal activity involving an imitation controlled substance,” “illegal activity involving gambling or promoting gambling,” “illegal activity involving a place of prostitution,” and “prostitution” have the meanings given in AS

34.03.360

;

“premises” means a structure or the structure of which it is a part, and facilities and appurtenances in it, and grounds, areas, and facilities held out for the use of persons entitled to possession under an agreement that relates to its use.

History.

(§ 36 ch 121 SLA 1994)